Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2958
Resignation of director.

(1) A director may resign at any time by giving notice in a record to the limited cooperative association.

(2) A resignation is effective when notice is received by the limited cooperative association unless the notice states a later effective date.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 58.